Washington statutes.
RCW 8.04.150

Appellate review.

Either party may seek appellate review of the judgment for damages entered in the superior court within thirty days after the entry of judgment as aforesaid, and such review shall bring before the supreme court or the court of appeals the propriety and justness of the amount of damages in respect to the parties to the review: PROVIDED HOWEVER, That upon such review no bond shall be required: AND PROVIDED FURTHER, That if the owner of land, the real estate or premises accepts the sum awarded by the jury, the court or the judge thereof, he or she shall be deemed thereby to have waived conclusively appellate review, and final judgment by default may be rendered in the superior court as in other cases: PROVIDED FURTHER, That no review shall operate so as to prevent the said state of Washington from taking possession of such property pending review after the amount of said award shall have been paid into court.

[ 2011 c 336 s 256; 1988 c 202 s 8; 1971 c 81 s 36; 1891 c 74 s 9; RRS s 899.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Cf. RAP 5.2, 8.1, 18.22.

Severability—1988 c 202: See note following RCW 2.24.050.